Oklahoma, session 2026, SB69.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.468 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 102 beginning at the intersection
of East 990 Road extending north to the intersection of East
Memorial Road in Lincoln County shall be designated as the “SFC
Tomas L. Avey Bronze Star and Purple Heart Recipient Memorial
Highway”. The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




ENGR. S. B. NO. 69 Page 1

Passed the Senate the 24th day of February, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 69 Page 2